apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
    <pardef n="Jul__np_f">
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ka</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ce</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ce</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kou</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ou</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ko</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ek</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ám</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kám</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ách</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kách</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ama</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kama</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kami</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Tom__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ové</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ů</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ům</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ech</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ama</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ové</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Zeye/r__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l>r</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ra</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ra</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rovi</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ru</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rovi</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ru</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rem</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>re</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ři</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ry</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rů</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rum</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rům</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rech</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rama</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ry</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ři</l><r>r<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ca/ha__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ha</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hu</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hy</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hovi</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hovi</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hou</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ho</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hové</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hy</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hů</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hům</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hách</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>zích</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hy</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>hové</l><r>ha<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Alem"><i>Alem</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Andul"><i>Andul</i><par n="Jul__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Aristid"><i>Aristid</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Baker"><i>Bake</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Baltazar"><i>Baltaza</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Baran"><i>Baran</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Bergman"><i>Bergman</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Boardman"><i>Boardman</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Bredesen"><i>Bredesen</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Bulhar"><i>Bulha</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Břetislav"><i>Břetislav</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Caha"><i>Ca</i><par n="Ca/ha__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Cohen"><i>Cohen</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Dalibor"><i>Dalibo</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Dam"><i>Dam</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Drummond"><i>Drummond</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Edvard"><i>Edvard</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Erbakan"><i>Erbakan</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Fernand"><i>Fernand</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Forrest"><i>Forrest</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Genscher"><i>Gensche</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Gent"><i>Gent</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Golem"><i>Golem</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Grund"><i>Grund</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Hamilton"><i>Hamilton</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Hecht"><i>Hecht</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Hoffman"><i>Hoffman</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Hubert"><i>Hubert</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Jahn"><i>Jahn</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Jarmil"><i>Jarmil</i><par n="Jul__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Jaromír"><i>Jaromí</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Jensen"><i>Jensen</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Jul"><i>Jul</i><par n="Jul__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Julian"><i>Julian</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Karajan"><i>Karajan</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Kilian"><i>Kilian</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Konrad"><i>Konrad</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Krčín"><i>Krčín</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Lachman"><i>Lachman</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Lenárt"><i>Lenárt</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Lucifer"><i>Lucife</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Lužkov"><i>Lužkov</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Majer"><i>Maje</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Mansell"><i>Mansell</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Maďar"><i>Maďa</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Mašín"><i>Mašín</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Mironov"><i>Mironov</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Mádl"><i>Mádl</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Nikol"><i>Nikol</i><par n="Jul__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Nixon"><i>Nixon</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Olivier"><i>Olivie</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Orión"><i>Orión</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Oscar"><i>Osca</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Paskov"><i>Paskov</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Petrosjan"><i>Petrosjan</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Primakov"><i>Primakov</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Rifkind"><i>Rifkind</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Roger"><i>Roge</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Rybkin"><i>Rybkin</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Schmid"><i>Schmid</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Sepp"><i>Sepp</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Stephen"><i>Stephen</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Terez"><i>Terez</i><par n="Jul__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Theodor"><i>Theodo</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Tibor"><i>Tibor</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Valentýn"><i>Valentýn</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Vendul"><i>Vendul</i><par n="Jul__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Waldstein"><i>Waldstein</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Zeyer"><i>Zeye</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Čerbajev"><i>Čerbajev</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Švejcar"><i>Švejca</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Švýcar"><i>Švýca</i><par n="Zeye/r__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ščerban"><i>Ščerban</i><par n="Tom__np_m"/></e>
